New York, session 2025-2026, A737.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph 2 of subdivision (c) of section 5205 of the civil 2 practice law and rules, as amended by chapter 141 of the laws of 2001, 3 is amended to read as follows: 4 2. For purposes of this subdivision, all trusts, custodial accounts, 5 annuities, insurance contracts, monies, assets or interests established 6 as part of, and all payments from, either any trust or plan, which is 7 qualified as an individual retirement account under section four hundred 8 eight or section four hundred eight A of the United States Internal 9 Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, a Keogh (HR-10), retirement or other 10 plan established by a corporation or other organization, which is quali- 11 fied under section 401 or 403 of the United States Internal Revenue Code 12 of 1986, as amended, or created as a result of rollovers from such plans 13 pursuant to sections 402 (a) (5), 403 (a) (4), 408 (d) (3) or 408A of 14 the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, or a plan that satisfies 15 the requirements of section 457 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as 16 amended, shall be considered a trust which has been created by or which 17 has proceeded from a person other than the judgment debtor, even though 18 such judgment debtor is (i) in the case of an individual retirement 19 account plan, an individual who is the settlor of and depositor to such 20 account plan, or (ii) a self-employed individual, or (iii) a partner of 21 the entity sponsoring the Keogh (HR-10) plan, or (iv) a shareholder of 22 the corporation sponsoring the retirement or other plan or (v) a partic- 23 ipant in a section 457 plan. 24 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to the 25 satisfaction of judgments on or after such date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02270-01-5